nl: Geluidseffecten: Compressie; Vertraging; EQ; Overdrive; Galm; Andere
fr: Effets sonores: Compression; Retard; EQ; Overdrive; Réverbération; Autre
en: Sound effects: Compression; Delay; EQ; Overdrive; Reverb; Other
zh-TW: 音效: 壓縮; 延遲; 平衡; 過載效果; 殘響; 其他
zh-CN: 音响效果: 压缩; 延迟; EQ; 过载; 混响; 其他
bg-BG: Звукови ефекти: Компресия; Забавяне; EQ; Overdrive; Реверберация; Други
pt-BR: Efeitos sonoros: Compressão; Delay; Equalizador; Overdrive; Reverb; Outro
fi: Ääniefektit: Pakkaus; Viive; EQ; Overdrive; Kaiku; Muu
es: Efectos de sonido: Compresión; Retardo; EQ; Sobremarcha; Reverberación; Otros
sv: Ljudeffekter: Kompression; Fördröjning; EQ; Överväxling; Reverb; Övrigt
el: Ηχητικά εφέ: Συμπίεση; Καθυστέρηση; EQ; Υπερπολλαπλασιασμένη ταχύτητα; Αντήχηση; Άλλο
ja: 音響効果: コンプレッション; ディレイ; EQ; オーバードライブ; リバーブ; その他
ko: 음향 효과: 컴프레션; 지연; EQ; 오버드라이브; 리버브; 기타
lt-LT: Garso efektai: Kompresija; „Delay“ (delsa); EQ; „Overdrive“; „Reverb“ (aidas); Kita
th: เสียงประกอบ: การบีบอัดสัญญาณเสียง; ดีเลย์; อีควอไลเซอร์; โอเวอร์ไดรฟ์; รีเวิร์บ; อื่นๆ
tr: Ses Efektleri: Sıkıştırma; Delay; EQ; Overdrive; Yankı; Diğer
sl-SI: Zvočni učinki: Stiskanje; Zamik; EQ; Navitje; Odmev; Drugo
ru: Звуковые эффекты: Сжатие; Задержка; EQ; Овердрайв; Реверберация; Другое
pt-PT: Efeitos sonoros: Compressão; Atraso; EQ; Sobrecarga; Reverberar; Outro
nb: Lydeffekter: Kompresjon; Forsinkelse; EQ; Overstyring; Klang; Annet
hr-HR: Zvučni efekti: Kompresija; Odgoda; EQ; Overdrive; Reverb; Ostalo
de: Soundeffekte: Kompression; Delay; EQ; Overdrive; Reverb; Sonstiges
cs: Zvukové efekty: Komprese; Zpoždění; EQ; Overdrive; Reverb; Jiné
ro-RO: Efecte sonore: Compresie; Întârziere; EQ; Overdrive; Reverberație; Altele
hu: Hangeffektusok: Tömörítés; Késleltetés; Hangszínszabályzás; Túlhajtás; Visszhang; Egyéb
da: Lydeffekter: Kompression; Forsinkelse; EQ; Overdrive; Rumklang; Andet
vi: Hiệu ứng âm thanh: Nén; Trì hoãn; EQ; Tăng cường âm thanh; Hiệu ứng vang; Khác
it: Effetti sonori: Compressione; Delay; EQ; Overdrive; Reverb; Altro
sk-SK: Zvukové efekty: Kompresný; Oneskorenie; Gombík EQ; Skreslenie stlačením zosilňovača pre čistý tón; Dozvuk; Iné
pl: Efekty dźwiękowe: Kompresja; Opóźnienie; EQ; Przesterowanie; Pogłos; Inne